Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB653.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.13) The amount of expenses incurred by an employe which are directly related to the attainment of higher education or career and technical education which are reimbursed by the employe's employer shall be deductible from taxable income on the annual personal income tax return to the extent the amount 12345678910111213141516171819202122 of reimbursement is reported as Federal taxable income.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0653PN0664 - 2 - 12345